Utah statutes.
63G-9-306.   Reconsideration of rejected claims.
The board shall not entertain for a third time a demand against the state or a
political subdivision once rejected by it or by the Legislature, unless the
facts or reasons are presented to the board as in actions between private
parties would furnish sufficient ground for granting a new trial.
